Alaska statutes. Title 13. Decedents’ Estates, Guardianships, Transfers, Trusts, and Health Care Decisions.
Article 1. Intestate Succession.

Sec. 13.12.101.
Intestate estate.

A part of a decedent’s estate not effectively disposed of by will passes by intestate succession to the decedent’s heirs as prescribed in AS 13.06 — AS 13.36, except as modified by the decedent’s will.

A decedent by will may expressly exclude or limit the right of an individual or class to succeed to property of the decedent passing by intestate succession. If that individual or a member of that class survives the decedent, the share of the decedent’s intestate estate to which that individual or class would have succeeded passes as if that individual or each member of that class had disclaimed the intestate share of the individual or member.

History.

(§ 3 ch 75 SLA 1996)

Sec. 13.12.102.
Share of spouse.

Except as provided in (b) of this section, the intestate share of a decedent’s surviving spouse is

the entire intestate estate if

no descendant or parent of the decedent survives the decedent; or

all of the decedent’s surviving descendants are also descendants of the surviving spouse and there is no other descendant of the surviving spouse who survives the decedent;

the first $200,000, plus three-fourths of any balance of the intestate estate, if no descendant of the decedent survives the decedent, but a parent of the decedent survives the decedent;

the first $150,000, plus one-half of any balance of the intestate estate, if all of the decedent’s surviving descendants are also descendants of the surviving spouse and the surviving spouse has one or more surviving descendants who are not descendants of the decedent;

the first $100,000, plus one-half of any balance of the intestate estate, if one or more of the decedent’s surviving descendants are not descendants of the surviving spouse.

The intestate share of the surviving spouse in settlement common stock or other inalienable stock in a corporation organized under the laws of the state under 43 U.S.C. 1601 et seq. (Alaska Native Claims Settlement Act) is

all of it if there is no surviving issue; or

one-half of it if the decedent is survived by issue.

History.

(§ 3 ch 75 SLA 1996; am § 17 ch 56 SLA 2005)

Sec. 13.12.103.
Share of heirs other than surviving spouse.

A part of the intestate estate not passing to the decedent’s surviving spouse under AS

13.12.102

, or the entire intestate estate if there is no surviving spouse, passes in the following order to the individuals designated below who survive the decedent:

to the decedent’s descendants by representation;

if there is no surviving descendant, to the decedent’s parents equally if both survive, or to the surviving parent;

if there is no surviving descendant or parent, to the descendants of the decedent’s parents or either of them by representation;

if there is no surviving descendant, parent, or descendant of a parent, but the decedent is survived by one or more grandparents or descendants of grandparents, half of the estate passes to the decedent’s paternal grandparents equally if both survive, or to the surviving paternal grandparent, or to the descendants of the decedent’s paternal grandparents or either of them if both are deceased, the descendants taking by representation; and the other half passes to the decedent’s maternal relatives in the same manner; but if there is no surviving grandparent or descendant of a grandparent on either the paternal or the maternal side, the entire estate passes to the decedent’s relatives on the other side in the same manner as the half.

History.

(§ 3 ch 75 SLA 1996)

Sec. 13.12.104.
Requirement that heir survive decedent for 120 hours.

An individual who fails to survive the decedent by 120 hours is considered to have predeceased the decedent for purposes of homestead allowance, exempt property, and intestate succession, and the decedent’s heirs are determined accordingly. If it is not established by clear and convincing evidence that an individual who would otherwise be an heir survived the decedent by 120 hours, it is considered that the individual failed to survive for the required period. This section is not to be applied if its application would result in a taking of intestate estate by the state under AS

13.12.105

.

History.

(§ 3 ch 75 SLA 1996)

Sec. 13.12.105.
No taker.

If there is no taker under this chapter,

personal property in the intestate estate passes to the state and is subject to AS

34.45.280

—

34.45.780

; if notice to heirs, substantially equivalent to that required by AS

34.45.310

, has been given by the personal representative or other person, AS

34.45.310

does not apply;

real property in the intestate estate passes to the state and is subject to AS

38.95.200

—

38.95.270

.

History.

(§ 3 ch 75 SLA 1996)

Sec. 13.12.106.
Representation.

If, under AS

13.12.103

(1), all or part of a decedent’s intestate estate passes by representation to the decedent’s descendants, the estate or part of the estate passing is divided into as many equal shares as there are

surviving descendants in the generation nearest to the decedent that contains one or more surviving descendants; and

deceased descendants in the same generation who left surviving descendants, if any.

Under (a) of this section, each surviving descendant in the nearest generation is allocated one share, and the remaining shares, if any, are combined and then divided in the same manner among the surviving descendants of the deceased descendants as if the surviving descendants who were allocated a share and their surviving descendants had predeceased the decedent.

If, under AS

13.12.103

(3) or (4), all or part of a decedent’s intestate estate passes by representation to the descendants of the decedent’s deceased parents or either of them or to the descendants of the decedent’s deceased paternal or maternal grandparents or either of them, the estate or part of the estate passing is divided into as many equal shares as there are

surviving descendants in the generation nearest the deceased parents or either of them, or the deceased grandparents or either of them, that contains one or more surviving descendants; and

deceased descendants in the same generation who left surviving descendants, if any.

Under (c) of this section, each surviving descendant in the nearest generation is allocated one share, and the remaining shares, if any, are combined and then divided in the same manner among the surviving descendants of the deceased descendants as if the surviving descendants who were allocated a share and their surviving descendants had predeceased the decedent.

In this section, “deceased descendant,” “deceased parent,” or “deceased grandparent” means a descendant, parent, or grandparent who either predeceased the decedent or is considered to have predeceased the decedent under AS

13.12.104

.

History.

(§ 3 ch 75 SLA 1996)

Sec. 13.12.107.
Kindred of half blood.

Relatives of the half blood inherit the same share they would inherit if they were of the whole blood.

History.

(§ 3 ch 75 SLA 1996)

Sec. 13.12.108.
After-born heirs.

An individual in gestation at a particular time is treated as living at that time if the individual lives 120 hours or more after birth.

History.

(§ 3 ch 75 SLA 1996)

Sec. 13.12.109.
Advancements.

If an individual dies intestate as to all or a portion of the individual’s estate, property the decedent gave during the decedent’s lifetime to an individual who, at the decedent’s death, is an heir is treated as an advancement against the heir’s intestate share only if

the decedent declared in a contemporaneous writing or the heir acknowledged in writing that the gift is an advancement; or

the decedent’s contemporaneous writing or the heir’s written acknowledgment otherwise indicates that the gift is to be taken into account in computing the division and distribution of the decedent’s intestate estate.

For purposes of (a) of this section, property advanced is valued as of the time the heir came into possession or enjoyment of the property or as of the time of the decedent’s death, whichever first occurs.

If the recipient of the property fails to survive the decedent, the property is not taken into account in computing the division and distribution of the decedent’s intestate estate, unless the decedent’s contemporaneous writing provides otherwise.

History.

(§ 3 ch 75 SLA 1996)

Collateral references. —

3 Am. Jur. 2d, Advancements, § 1 et seq.

23 Am. Jur. 2d, Descent and Distribution, §§ 1, 115, 158, 161, 166.

Decedent’s gift to heir as advancement, 35 Am. Jur. POF2d, pp. 357 — 404.

26A C.J.S., Descent and Distribution, §§ 91
—
115.

Presumption and burden of proof with respect to advancement. 31 ALR2d 1036.

Sec. 13.12.110.
Debts to decedent.

A debt owed to a decedent is not charged against the intestate share of any individual except the debtor. If the debtor fails to survive the decedent, the debt is not taken into account in computing the intestate share of the debtor’s descendants.

History.

(§ 3 ch 75 SLA 1996)

Sec. 13.12.111.
Alienage.

An individual is not disqualified to take as an heir because the individual or another individual through whom the individual claims is or has been an alien.

History.

(§ 3 ch 75 SLA 1996)

Sec. 13.12.113.
Individuals related to decedent through two lines.

An individual who is related to the decedent through two lines of relationship is entitled to only a single share based on the relationship that would entitle the individual to the larger share.

History.

(§ 3 ch 75 SLA 1996)

Sec. 13.12.114.
Parent and child relationship.

Except as provided in (b) — (d) of this section, for purposes of intestate succession by, through, or from a person, an individual is the child of the individual’s natural parents, regardless of their marital status, and the parent and child relationship may be established as indicated under AS

25.20.050

.

An adopted individual is the child of the individual’s adopting parent or parents and not of the individual’s natural parents, but adoption of a child by the spouse of either natural parent does not affect

the relationship between the child and that natural parent; or

the right of the child or a descendant of the child to inherit from or through the other natural parent.

Inheritance from or through a child by either natural parent or the natural parent’s kindred is precluded unless that natural parent has openly treated the child as the natural parent’s child, and has not refused to support the child.

To the extent there is a conflict between this section and either AS

25.20.050

or AS

25.23.130

, this section controls.

History.

(§ 3 ch 75 SLA 1996)